District of Columbia statutes.
3-1210.01

Practicing without license, registration, or certification.

No person shall practice, attempt to practice, or offer to practice a health occupation licensed, registered, certified, or regulated under this chapter in the District unless currently licensed, registered, or certified, or exempted from licensure, registration, or certification, under this chapter.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1001, 33 DCR 729
July 18, 2009, D.C. Law 18-26, § 2(g), 56 DCR 4043
1981 Ed., § 2-3310.1.
D.C. Law 18-26 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “No person shall practice, attempt to practice, or offer to practice a health occupation licensed or regulated under this chapter in the District unless currently licensed, or exempted from licensing, under this chapter.”
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(g) of Health Occupations Revision General Amendment Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-146, July 28, 2009, 56 DCR 6308).